Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1682, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 355, O.S.L. 2024 (59 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 1682), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1682. A. As used in the Electrical License Act:
1. "Board" means the Construction Industries Board;
2. "Committee" means the Committee of Electrical Examiners
appointed by the Board;
3. "Electrical apprentice" means any person sixteen (16) years
of age or older whose principal occupation is the learning of and
assisting in the installation of electrical work under the direct
Req. No. 14332 Page 1

supe rvision of a licensed journeyman electrician or electrical
contractor;
4. "Journeyman electrician" means any person other than an
electrical contractor who engages in the actual installation,
alteration, repair or renovation of electrical facilities or
electrical construction work who is licensed to install, alter,
repair, maintain, or renovate electric systems and is under the
employment or supervision of a licensed electrical contractor unless
specifically exempted by the provisions of the Electrical License
Act;
5. "Electrical contractor" means any person skilled in the
planning, superintending and practical installation of electrical
facilities who is familiar with the laws, rules and regulations
governing such work. Electrical contractor also means any
individual, firm, partnership, corporation, limited liability
company or business performing skills of an electrical contractor or
an electrician or the business of contracting, or furnishing labor
or labor and materials for the installation, repair, maintenance or
renovation of electrical facilities or electrical construction work
according to the provisions of the Electrical License Act;
6. "Electrical facilities" means all wiring, fixtures,
appurtenances and appliances for, and in connection with, a supply
of electricity within or adjacent to any building, structure or

Req. No. 14332 Page 2

conv eyance on the premises but not including the connection with a
power supply meter or other power supply source;
7. "Category" means the classification by which licenses and
electrical work may be limited. Such categories shall include but
shall not be limited to installation, maintenance, repair,
alteration, residential, oilfield and commercial;
8. "Temporary journeyman electrician" means any person other
than a person permanently licensed as a journeyman electrician or
electrical contractor in this state who meets the temporary
licensure requirements of Section 1685.1 of this title;
9. "Variance and Appeals Board" means the Oklahoma State
Electrical Installation Code Variance and Appeals Board;
10. "Electrical construction work" means installation,
fabrication or assembly of equipment or systems included in
"premises wiring" as defined in the National Electrical Code
(reference 158:40-1-4. Standard of Installation), and which is
hereby adopted and incorporated by reference. Electrical
construction work includes but is not limited to installation of
raceway systems used for any electrical purposes, and installation
of field-assembled systems such as ice and snow melting, pipe-
tracing and manufactured wiring systems. Electrical construction
work shall not include in-plant work performed by employees of the
company owning the plant, work performed by telecommunications
employees for telecommunications companies or installation of
Req. No. 14332 Page 3

fact ory-assembled appliances or machinery which is not part of the
premises wiring unless wiring interconnections external to the
equipment are required in the field;
11. "Electrical work" means work consisting primarily of the
layout, installation, maintenance, repair, testing or replacement of
all or part of electrical wires, conduits, apparatus, fixtures,
appliances or equipment for transmitting, carrying, controlling or
using electricity in, on, outside or attached to a building,
structure, property or premises. Electrical work shall not mean
work that is related to or facilitates the construction,
installation or maintenance of all or part of an electrical system,
but which does not involve actual work with any of the electrical
components provided in this definition; and
12. "Student apprentice" means any person sixteen (16) years of
age or older who complies with the requirements for registration
under Section 1686 of this title.
B. Class 2 and Class 3 circuits shall be exempt from the
requirements of electrical licensing of either an electrical
contractor or a journeyman electrician, provided the work is
performed in accordance with the National Fire Protection
Association 70 requirements for Class 2 and Class 3 circuits.
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1698.1 of Title 59, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Req. No. 14332 Page 4

A. A journeyman electrician may work on behalf of the licensed
contractor, supervise apprentices, and other duties described in
Section 1682 of this title.
B. Only a licensed contractor under the Oklahoma Electrical
Licensing Act may bid for a project or enter into a contract for a
project. A journeyman electrician may carry out contractual duties
as part of the licensed contractor's crew but shall not
independently enter into a contract or sign on behalf of the
contractor without proper licensing under the Oklahoma Electrical
Licensing Act.
C. All permits for electrical work must be obtained under the
licensed contractor's name and license number.
D. The licensed contractor shall be legally liable for the
relevant work performed by the journeyman electrician in regard to
the contracted job.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-14332 TKR 01/13/26






Req. No. 14332 Page 5